Washington statutes.
RCW 18.145.090

Certification applications—Fee.

Applications for certification shall be submitted on forms provided by the department. The department may require information and documentation to determine whether the applicant meets the standard for certification as provided in this chapter. Each applicant shall pay a fee determined by the director as provided in RCW 43.24.086 which shall accompany the application.

[ 1995 c 27 s 9; 1989 c 382 s 10.]